Alabama, session 2026rs, HB236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
15 Section 1. In addition to all other appropriations
16 heretofore or hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated a
17 total of $275,100,000 from the Education Trust Fund
18 Advancement and Technology Fund to the public institutions of
19 higher education for the fiscal year ending September 30,
20 2026. This appropriation shall be expended as provided in
21 Section 29-9-4, Code of Alabama 1975. This appropriation shall
22 be distributed as follows:
23 Alabama Community College System $102,630,833
24 The above appropriation to the Alabama
25 Community College System includes funding
26 for the following:
27 Civics Academy 150,000
28 Alabama A&M University 6,603,176
Page 1

Alabama A&M University 6,603,176
HB236 Enrolled
29 Alabama State University 3,618,925
30 University of Alabama System 63,655,827
31 Athens State University 3,396,437
32 Auburn University 30,644,049
33 Auburn University Montgomery 5,220,244
34 Jacksonville State University 10,736,161
35 University of Montevallo 3,363,650
36 University of North Alabama 10,322,804
37 University of South Alabama 13,243,822
38 Troy University 13,357,993
39 Alabama Commission on Higher Education 990,360
40 for Tuskegee University
41 University of West Alabama 7,315,719
42 Total $275,100,000
43
44 Section 2. (a) In addition to all other appropriations
45 heretofore or hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated a
46 total of $570,000,000 from the Education Trust Fund
47 Advancement and Technology Fund to the Department of
48 Education, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026. This
49 appropriation shall be expended as provided in Section 29-9-4,
50 Code of Alabama 1975, except as provided in subsection (c).
51 The Department of Education shall allocate the funds
52 appropriated herein to the local boards of education and other
53 entities as follows:
54 Alabaster City 4,847,497
55 Albertville City 4,494,078
Page 2

Albertville City 4,494,078
HB236 Enrolled
56 Alexander City 2,146,983
57 Andalusia City 1,377,689
58 Anniston City 1,324,437
59 Arab City 1,949,822
60 Athens City 4,093,266
61 Attalla City 1,096,952
62 Auburn City 7,421,603
63 Autauga County 6,723,497
64 Baldwin County 24,248,141
65 Barbour County 478,882
66 Bessemer City 2,256,989
67 Bibb County 2,291,757
68 Birmingham City 15,485,662
69 Blount County 5,751,142
70 Boaz City 1,957,964
71 Brewton City 872,024
72 Bullock County 1,039,176
73 Butler County 1,994,816
74 Calhoun County 6,026,255
75 Chambers County 2,369,080
76 Cherokee County 2,851,186
77 Chickasaw City 1,943,569
78 Chilton County 5,915,030
79 Choctaw County 763,080
80 Clarke County 1,596,757
Page 3

Clarke County 1,596,757
HB236 Enrolled
81 Clay County 1,348,601
82 Cleburne County 1,857,475
83 Coffee County 2,205,585
84 Colbert County 1,906,441
85 Conecuh County 967,635
86 Coosa County 580,982
87 Covington County 2,269,968
88 Crenshaw County 1,533,829
89 Cullman City 2,490,413
90 Cullman County 7,523,311
91 Dale County 2,578,669
92 Daleville City 872,693
93 Dallas County 1,711,601
94 Decatur City 6,649,242
95 DeKalb County 6,614,002
96 Demopolis City 1,440,617
97 Dothan City 6,157,027
98 Elba City 443,839
99 Elmore County 8,781,004
100 Enterprise City 5,065,345
101 Escambia County 3,024,985
102 Etowah County 6,590,365
103 Eufaula City 6,137,087
104 Fairfield City 1,085,900
105 Fayette County 1,687,609
Page 4

Fayette County 1,687,609
HB236 Enrolled
106 Florence City 3,543,315
107 Fort Payne City 2,642,934
108 Franklin County 2,676,168
109 Gadsden City 3,725,295
110 Geneva City 941,599
111 Geneva County 2,085,275
112 Greene County 654,057
113 Gulf Shores City 2,070,919
114 Guntersville City 1,357,120
115 Hale County 1,611,467
116 Haleyville City 1,200,704
117 Hartselle City 2,751,996
118 Henry County 1,911,751
119 Homewood City 3,503,277
120 Hoover City 10,479,587
121 Houston County 5,266,715
122 Huntsville City 18,212,290
123 Jackson County 3,830,974
124 Jacksonville City 1,281,606
125 Jasper City 2,265,367
126 Jefferson County 26,925,883
127 Lamar County 1,622,440
128 Lanett City 727,172
129 Lauderdale County 5,909,406
130
131 Lawrence County 3,490,416
Page 5

Lawrence County 3,490,416
HB236 Enrolled
132 Lee County 6,817,298
133 Leeds City 1,650,954
134 Limestone County
135 Of this appropriation for Limestone County
136 Board of Education, $650,000 shall be used for
137 athletic facility enhancements. 12,373,914
138 Linden City 287,069
139 Lowndes County 842,133
140 Macon County 1,279,640
141 Madison City 9,958,583
142 Madison County 15,666,265
143 Marengo County 710,299
144 Marion County 2,514,011
145 Marshall County 4,616,787
146 Midfield City 749,550
147 Mobile County 37,491,209
148 Monroe County 2,235,122
149 Montgomery County 19,842,635
150 Morgan County 5,724,358
151 Mountain Brook City 3,430,556
152 Muscle Shoals City 2,239,487
153 Oneonta City 1,081,967
154 Opelika City 4,108,801
155 Opp City 997,526
156 Orange Beach City 946,122
157 Oxford City 3,049,213
158 Ozark City 1,423,666
Page 6

Ozark City 1,423,666
HB236 Enrolled
159 Pelham City 2,682,736
160 Pell City 3,104,117
161 Perry County 607,215
162 Phenix City 5,411,410
163 Pickens County 1,715,534
164 Piedmont City 807,916
165 Pike County 1,572,805
166 Pike Road City 2,169,952
167
168 Randolph County 1,572,884
169 Roanoke City 992,570
170 Russell County 2,874,037
171 Russellville City 1,994,029
172 Saraland City 2,733,826
173 Satsuma City 1,175,219
174 Scottsboro City 1,859,403
175 Selma City 1,720,214
176 Sheffield City 759,265
177 Shelby County 15,991,170
178 St. Clair County 7,273,447
179 Sumter County 672,542
180 Sylacauga City 1,481,953
181 Talladega City 1,098,761
182 Talladega County 5,335,227
183 Tallapoosa County 2,138,763
184 Tallassee City 1,129,871
Page 7

Tallassee City 1,129,871
HB236 Enrolled
185 Tarrant City 993,436
186 Thomasville City 755,883
187 Troy City 1,377,060
188 Trussville City 3,903,499
189 Tuscaloosa City 8,266,411
190 Tuscaloosa County 14,450,064
191 Tuscumbia City 1,219,858
192 Vestavia Hills City 5,405,785
193 Walker County 5,234,110
194 Washington County 1,799,503
195 Wilcox County 829,469
196 Winfield City 914,500
197 Winston County 1,724,422
198 University Charter School 520,375
199 Cyber Technology and Engineering, Alabama
200 School of 288,682
201 MAEF Charter School 647,725
202 LEAD Academy 569,695
203 Legacy Prep 418,589
204 I-3 Academy 624,167
205 Youth Services School District, Department of 125,856
206 Deaf and Blind, Alabama Institute for the 257,847
207 Math and Science, Alabama School of 215,528
208 Fine Arts, Alabama School of 264,022
209 Life Academy 462,245
210 Breakthrough Charter 277,552
Page 8

Breakthrough Charter 277,552
HB236 Enrolled
211 Magic City Acceptance Academy 268,545
212 Freedom Prep Academy 29,851
213 Floretta P. Carson - Mobile 181,744
214 Ivy Classical Academy - Prattville 474,949
215 Healthcare Sciences, Alabama School of 70,794
216 Empower Community School 321,050
217 AL Aerospace and Aviation 125,502
218 Covenant Academy of Mobile 256,785
219 I Dream Big Academy 157,320
220 Independence Prep 125,854
221 Teacher Professional Development 2,000,000
222 Totals 570,000,000
223 (b) Notwithstanding any other laws to the contrary, the
224 funds appropriated to the Department of Education by
225 subsection (a) of this section shall not be expended without
226 prior approval of the State Superintendent of Education.
227 (c) In addition to the allowed expenditure categories,
228 and notwithstanding Section 29-9-4, Code of Alabama 1975,
229 funds appropriated in this section may be expended for debt
230 service.
231 (d)(1) The above appropriation for teacher professional
232 development shall be allocated to the Alabama Department of
233 Education to be distributed to the Ed Farm Classroom of
234 Tomorrow. These funds will be used by Ed Farm to provide
Page 9

Tomorrow. These funds will be used by Ed Farm to provide
HB236 Enrolled
235 technology tools and professional development services to
236 classroom teachers in an effort to improve instruction and
237 student learning gains. It is the intent of the legislature
238 that in addition to general programmatic costs, Ed Farm may
239 also expend funds for software, hardware, administrative
240 costs, and professional learning services.
241 (2) The State Superintendent shall provide a report of the
242 initiative to the Chair of the House Ways and Means-Education
243 Committee and the Chair of the Senate Committee on Finance and
244 Taxation-Education no later than October 1, 2027.
245 Section 3. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section
246 29-9-4, Code of Alabama 1975, and in addition to all other
247 appropriations heretofore or hereafter made, there is hereby
248 appropriated a total of $4,900,000 from the Education Trust
249 Fund Advancement and Technology Fund to the Department of
250 Education to be allocated to the local boards of education and
251 entities as follows:
252 Auburn City - outdoor
253 classroom 500,000
254 Birmingham City - security
255 cameras 30,000
256 Trussville City - Cahaba
257 Elementary outdoor classroom 100,000
258 Clay County - agriculture barn 100,000
Page 10

Clay County - agriculture barn 100,000
HB236 Enrolled
259 Coffee County 230,000
260 Coosa County - storm shelter 50,000
261 Elba City - roof repairs 380,000
262 Elmore County - CTE IB Program 550,000
263 Fairfield City - Preparatory
264 School 35,000
265 Fayette County 100,000
266 Hale County - Greensboro
267 campus 350,000
268 Trussville City -
269 Hewitt-Trussville - high
270 school athletic equipment 245,000
271 Lamar County 100,000
272 Jackson County - for natural
273 gas expansion and connection
274 project 350,000
275 Jefferson County - Chalkville
276 Elementary School 75,000
277 Jefferson County - Clay
278 Elementary School 75,000
279 Morgan County - Eva Elementary
280 School outdoor activity center 90,000
281 Orange Beach Culinary School 350,000
282 Perry County 100,000
Page 11

Perry County 100,000
HB236 Enrolled
283 Tarrant City High School 100,000
284 Thomasville City - Middle
285 School cafeteria 100,000
286 Tuscaloosa County - CTE
287 Program 140,000
288 Montgomery County - Westside
289 Workforce Development Center 500,000
290 Vestavia City - auditorium
291 plan 100,000
292 Wilcox/Autauga Civics Academy 150,000
293
294 Section 4. (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section
295 29-9-4, Code of Alabama 1975, and in addition to all other
296 appropriations heretofore or hereafter made, there is hereby
297 appropriated a total of $150,000,000 from the Education Trust
298 Fund Advancement and Technology Fund to the Department of
299 Education to provide matching grants to local education
300 agencies for expenses related to developing regional career
301 technology centers throughout the state, including capital
302 outlay and equipment, for the fiscal year ending September 30,
303 2026. Grant proposals shall be submitted by a collaboration of
304 at least two local education agencies or between a local
305 education agency partnering with a community college within
306 the Alabama Community College System. Should a local education
Page 12

the Alabama Community College System. Should a local education
HB236 Enrolled
307 agency partner with a community college, the local education
308 agency shall maintain full control of the grant from the
309 Department of Education.
310 (b) The State Superintendent of Education shall appoint a
311 committee to review and recommend grant proposals for
312 approval. The State Superintendent of Education shall utilize
313 a sliding scale of matching requirements for grant proposals,
314 taking into consideration the financial capacity of the
315 eligible local education agencies to provide matching funds,
316 so long as the required match does not exceed 50 percent of
317 the total cost of the project. The State Superintendent of
318 Education may give preference in awarding grants pursuant to
319 this section to grant proposals from local education agencies
320 that were not awarded the full amount of grant funds requested
321 pursuant to Act 2025-269, and to grant proposals from local
322 education agencies that submitted applications for grant funds
323 pursuant Act 2025-269 but did not receive a grant. However,
324 the total amount of grant funds that may be awarded for the
325 same project shall not exceed $20,000,000 for all grant years.
326 (c) The State Superintendent of Education shall notify
327 each local superintendent and finance officer of each local
328 education agency by email regarding the availability and
329 application process of grants to be awarded pursuant to this
330 section, including any required forms. The State
Page 13

section, including any required forms. The State
HB236 Enrolled
331 Superintendent shall notify all members of the local
332 legislative delegation five days prior to the announcement of
333 any grant made to any entity located in the legislative
334 jurisdiction. The five days prior notice requirement shall be
335 waived in the event of a declared emergency. The Governor
336 shall encourage the Department to disburse the funds provided
337 herein on a nondiscriminatory basis.
338 Section 5. All funds appropriated herein and not
339 expended in the current fiscal year shall not revert but be
340 carried forward for the purpose appropriated.
341 Section 6. This act shall become effective immediately
342 following its passage and approval by the Governor, or its
343 otherwise becoming law.
Page 14

otherwise becoming law.
HB236 Enrolled
344
345
346
347
348
349
350
351
352
353
354 ________________________________________________
355 Speaker of the House of Representatives
356
357
358
359 ________________________________________________
360 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
361
362
363 House of Representatives
364
365 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
366 was passed by the House 12-Mar-26, as amended.
367
368 John Treadwell
369 Clerk
370
371
372
373
374
375 Senate 02-Apr-26 Amended and Passed
376
377 House 07-Apr-26 Concurred in Senate
378 Amendment
379
380
Page 15